test/src/morphology/N-pani_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - паны: # Noun 'clothing' - full paradigm /Type 9/
     паны+N+Sg+Nom: паны
     паны+N+Sg+Acc: панымʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Gen: паныʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Dat: панэнʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Loc: панэхэна
     паны+N+Sg+Abl: панэхэд
     паны+N+Sg+Pros: панэвна
     паны+N+Du+Nom: панэхэʼ
     паны+N+Du+Acc: панэхэʼ
     паны+N+Du+Gen: панэхэʼ
     паны+N+Pl+Nom: паныˮ
     паны+N+Pl+Acc: паны
     паны+N+Pl+Gen: паныˮ
     паны+N+Pl+Dat: панэхэˮ
     паны+N+Pl+Loc: панэхэˮна
     паны+N+Pl+Abl: панэхэт
     паны+N+Pl+Pros: паныˮмана    
          
     паны+N+Tra: панэӈэ
     паны+N+Car: панэсиˮ
     паны+N+Equ: панэдаремʼ
     паны+N+Equ+Lat: панэдаремʼ
     
# Possessive forms 

     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: панэв 
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: панэр  
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: панэда 
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: панэмиʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: панэриʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: панэдиʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: панэваˮ
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: панэраˮ
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: панэдоʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: панэв
     паны+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: панэмд  
     паны+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: панэмда 
     паны+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: панэмиʼ 
     паны+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: панэмдиʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: панэмдиʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: панэваˮ 
     паны+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: панэмдаˮ
     паны+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: панэмдоʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [панэн, панэни]
     паны+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: панэнд
     паны+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: панэнда 
     паны+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: панэниʼ 
     паны+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: панэндиʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: панэндиʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: панэнаˮ 
     паны+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: панэндаˮ
     паны+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: панэндоʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [панэхэн, панэхэни]
     паны+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: панэхэнд
     паны+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: панэхэнда
     паны+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: панэхэниʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: панэхэндиʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: панэхэндиʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: панэхэнаˮ
     паны+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: панэхэндаˮ
     паны+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: панэхэндоʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [панэхэнан, панэхэнани]
     паны+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: панэхэнанд
     паны+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: панэхэнанда 
     паны+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: панэхэнаниʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: панэхэнандиʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: панэхэнандиʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: панэхэнанаˮ 
     паны+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: панэхэнандаˮ
     паны+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: панэхэнандоʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [панэхэдан, панэхэдани]  
     паны+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: панэхэданд  
     паны+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: панэхэданда 
     паны+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: панэхэданиʼ 
     паны+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: панэхэдандиʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: панэхэдандиʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: панэхэданаˮ 
     паны+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: панэхэдандаˮ
     паны+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: панэхэдандоʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [панэвнан, панэвнани]
     паны+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: панэвнанд  
     паны+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: панэвнанда 
     паны+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: панэвнаниʼ 
     паны+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: панэвнандиʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: панэвнандиʼ
     паны+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: панэвнанаˮ 
     паны+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: панэвнандаˮ
     паны+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: панэвнандоʼ
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: панэхэюн  
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: панэхэюд  
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: панэхэюда 
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: панэхэюниʼ
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: панэхэюдиʼ
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: панэхэюдиʼ
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: панэхэюнаˮ
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: панэхэюдаˮ
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: панэхэюдоʼ
     паны+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: панэхэюн  
     паны+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: панэхэюд  
     паны+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: панэхэюда 
     паны+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: панэхэюниʼ
     паны+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: панэхэюдиʼ
     паны+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: панэхэюдиʼ
     паны+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: панэхэюнаˮ
     паны+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: панэхэюдаˮ
     паны+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: панэхэюдоʼ
     паны+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: панэхэюн  
     паны+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: панэхэют  
     паны+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: панэхэюта 
     паны+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: панэхэюниʼ
     паны+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: панэхэютиʼ
     паны+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: панэхэютиʼ
     паны+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: панэхэюнаˮ
     паны+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: панэхэютаˮ
     паны+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: панэхэютоʼ
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: панын
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: паныд   
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: паныда  
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: паныниʼ 
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: паныдиʼ 
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: паныдиʼ 
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: панынаˮ 
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: паныдаˮ 
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: паныдоʼ 
     паны+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: панын 
     паны+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: паныд   
     паны+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: паныда 
     паны+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: паныниʼ
     паны+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: паныдиʼ 
     паны+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: паныдиʼ 
     паны+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: панынаˮ
     паны+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: паныдаˮ 
     паны+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: паныдоʼ 
     паны+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: паныˮн
     паны+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: паныт   
     паны+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: паныта  
     паны+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: паныˮниʼ
     паны+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: панытиʼ 
     паны+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: панытиʼ 
     паны+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: паныˮнаˮ 
     паны+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: панытаˮ 
     паны+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: панытоʼ 
     паны+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: панэхэˮн 
     паны+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: панэхэт 
     паны+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: панэхэта 
     паны+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: панэхэˮниʼ 
     паны+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: панэхэтиʼ 
     паны+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: панэхэтиʼ 
     паны+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: панэхэˮнаˮ 
     паны+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: панэхэтаˮ 
     паны+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: панэхэтоʼ 
     паны+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: панэхэˮнан  
     паны+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: панэхэˮнат  
     паны+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: панэхэˮната 
     паны+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: панэхэˮнаниʼ
     паны+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: панэхэˮнатиʼ
     паны+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: панэхэˮнатиʼ
     паны+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: панэхэˮнанаˮ
     паны+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: панэхэˮнатаˮ
     паны+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: панэхэˮнатоʼ
     паны+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: панэхэтан
     паны+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: панэхэтат 
     паны+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: панэхэтата 
     паны+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: панэхэтаниʼ
     паны+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: панэхэтатиʼ
     паны+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: панэхэтатиʼ
     паны+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: панэхэтанаˮ
     паны+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: панэхэтатаˮ
     паны+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: панэхэтатоʼ
     паны+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: паныˮманан  
     паны+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: паныˮманат  
     паны+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: паныˮманата 
     паны+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: паныˮмананиʼ
     паны+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: паныˮманатиʼ
     паны+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: паныˮманатиʼ
     паны+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: паныˮмананаˮ
     паны+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: паныˮманатаˮ
     паны+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: паныˮманатоʼ
     
# Predestinative 

     паны+N+Pred+Abs: панэд
     паны+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [панэдав, панэдув]
     паны+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: панэдар
     паны+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: панэдада
     паны+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: панэдамиʼ
     паны+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: панэдариʼ
     паны+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: панэдадиʼ
     паны+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: панэдаваˮ
     паны+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: панэдараˮ
     паны+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: панэдадоʼ
     паны+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [панэдав, панэдув]
     паны+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: панэдамд
     паны+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: панэдамда
     паны+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: панэдамиʼ
     паны+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: панэдамдиʼ
     паны+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: панэдамдиʼ
     паны+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: панэдаваˮ
     паны+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: панэдамдаˮ
     паны+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: панэдамдоʼ    
     паны+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: панэдан
     паны+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: панэданд
     паны+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: панэданда
     паны+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: панэданиʼ
     паны+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: панэдандиʼ
     паны+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: панэдандиʼ
     паны+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: панэданаˮ
     паны+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: панэдандаˮ
     паны+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: панэдандоʼ
     
# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     паны+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: панэдмʼ
     паны+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: панэн  
     паны+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: паны   
     паны+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: панэниʼ
     паны+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: панэдиʼ
     паны+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: панэхэʼ
     паны+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: панэваˮ
     паны+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: панэдаˮ
     паны+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: паныˮ  
     паны+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: панэдамзь
     паны+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: панэнась  
     паны+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [панэсь, панысь] 
     паны+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: панэнинзь
     паны+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: панэдинзь
     паны+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: панэхэнзь
     паны+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: панэваць 
     паны+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: панэдаць 
     паны+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [панэць, паныць]
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: панэв
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: панэр   
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: панэда   
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: панэмиʼ  
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: панэриʼ  
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: панэдиʼ 
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: панэваˮ
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: панэраˮ
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: панэдоʼ  
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: панэхэюн
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: панэхэюд
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: панэхэюда   
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: панэхэюниʼ  
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: панэхэюдиʼ  
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: панэхэюдиʼ 
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: панэхэюнаˮ
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: панэхэюдаˮ
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: панэхэюдоʼ
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: панын
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: паныд   
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: паныда   
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: паныниʼ  
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: паныдиʼ  
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: паныдиʼ 
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: панынаˮ
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: паныдаˮ
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: паныдоʼ 
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: панэвась
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: панэрась
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: панэдась 
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: панэминзь 
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: панэринзь
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: панэдинзь
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: панэваць
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: панэраць
     паны+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: панэдонзь 
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: панэхэюнась
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: панэхэюдась
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: панэхэюдась 
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: панэхэюнинзь 
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: панэхэюдинзь
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: панэхэюдинзь
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: панэхэюнаць
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: панэхэюдаць
     паны+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: панэхэюдонзь
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: панынась
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: паныдась
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: паныдась 
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: панынинзь 
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: паныдинзь
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: паныдинзь
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: панынаць
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: паныдаць
     паны+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: паныдонзь
     
